Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-144
Bonds issued by agency or political subdivision; registration not required.

Bonds issued after May 8, 2001, by any agency or political subdivision of the state shall not be registered in the office of the Auditor of Public Accounts.

Laws 2001, LB 420, § 1.